Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 9
FOSTER CARE, RESIDENTIAL, DAY TREATMENT,
AND CHILD PLACEMENT AGENCY LICENSING

26-6-901. Short title.

The short title of this part 9 is the "Foster Care, Residential, Day Treatment, and Agency Licensing Act".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 783, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-902. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that regulation and licensing of foster care homes, residential and day treatment child care facilities, and child placement agencies contribute to a safe and healthy environment for children and youth. The provision of such an environment affords benefits to children and youth, their families, their communities, and the larger society. It is the intent of the general assembly that those who regulate and those who are regulated work together to meet the needs of the children, youth, their families, foster care providers, child placement agencies, and residential and day treatment child care facilities.

In balancing the needs of children and their families with the needs of child placement agencies and the residential and day treatment child care industry, the general assembly also recognizes the financial demands the department of human services faces in its attempt to ensure a safe and sanitary environment for children of the state of Colorado who are in foster care with child placement agencies or in residential and day treatment child care facilities. In an effort to reduce the risk to children placed outside their homes while recognizing the financial constraints placed on the department, it is the intent of the general assembly that the limited resources available are focused primarily on residential and day treatment child care facilities and agencies that have demonstrated that children in their care may be at higher risk.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 783, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-903. Definitions.

As used in this part 9, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affiliate of a licensee" means:

A person or entity that owns more than five percent of the ownership interest in the business operated by the licensee or the applicant for a license; or

A person who is directly responsible for the care and welfare of children served; or

An executive, officer, member of the governing board, or employee of a licensee; or

A relative of a licensee, which relative provides care to children at the licensee's facility or agency or is otherwise involved in the management or operations of the licensee's facility or agency.

"Application" means a declaration of intent to obtain or continue a license or certificate for a residential or day treatment child care facility or child placement agency.

"Certificate" means a legal document granting permission to operate a foster care home or a kinship foster care home.

"Certification" means the process by which a county department of human or social services, a child placement agency, or a federally recognized tribe pursuant to applicable federal law approves the operation of a foster care home.

"Child care center" means a facility, by whatever name known, that is maintained for twenty-four-hour care for five or more children, unless otherwise specified in this subsection (5), who are not related to the owner, operator, or manager of the facility, whether the facility is operated with or without compensation for such care and with or without stated educational purposes. The term includes, but is not limited to, facilities commonly known as residential child care facilities, day treatment facilities, specialized group facilities, secure residential treatment centers, and respite child care facilities.

"Child placement agency" or "agency" means a corporation, partnership, association, firm, agency, institution, or person unrelated to the child being placed, who places, facilitates placement for a fee, or arranges for placement for care of a child under eighteen years of age with a family, person, or institution. A child placement agency may place, facilitate placement, or arrange for the placement of a child for the purpose of adoption, foster care, treatment foster care, or therapeutic foster care. The natural parents or guardian of a child who place the child for care with a facility licensed as a family child care home or child care center, as defined in section 26.5-5-303, are not a child placement agency.

"Cradle care home" means a facility that is certified by a child placement agency for the care of a child, or children in the case of multiple-birth siblings, who is twelve months of age or younger, in a place of residence for the purpose of providing twenty-four-hour family care for six months or less in anticipation of a voluntary relinquishment of the child or children, pursuant to article 5 of title 19, or while a county prepares an expedited permanency plan for an infant in its custody.

"Day treatment center" means a facility that:
(8) (a) (I) "Day treatment center" means a facility that:

Except as provided in subsection (8)(a)(II) of this section, provides less than twenty-four-hour care for groups of five or more children who are three years of age or older, but less than twenty-one years of age; and

Provides a structured program of various types of psycho-social and behavioral treatment to prevent or reduce the need for placement of the child out of the home or community.

Nothing in this subsection (8) prohibits a day treatment center from allowing a person who reaches twenty-one years of age after the commencement of an academic year from attending an educational program at the day treatment center through the end of the semester in which the twenty-first birthday occurs or until the person completes the educational program, whichever comes first.

"Day treatment center" does not include special education programs operated by a public or private school system or programs that are licensed by the department of early childhood for less than twenty-four-hour care of children, such as a child care center.

"Department" or "state department" means the state department of human services.

"Foster care home" means a home that is certified by a county department or a child placement agency pursuant to section 26-6-910, or a federally recognized tribe pursuant to applicable federal law, for child care in a place of residence of a family or person for the purpose of providing twenty-four-hour family foster care for a child under the age of twenty-one years. A foster care home may include foster care for a child who is unrelated to the head of the home or foster care provided through a kinship foster care home but does not include noncertified kinship care, as defined in section 19-1-103. The term includes a foster care home that receives a child for regular twenty-four-hour care and a home that receives a child from a state-operated institution for child care or from a child placement agency. "Foster care home" also includes those homes licensed by the department pursuant to section 26-6-905 that receive neither money from the counties nor children placed by the counties.

"Governing body" means the individual, partnership, corporation, or association in which the ultimate authority and legal responsibility is vested for the administration and operation of a residential or day treatment child care facility or a child placement agency.

"Guardian" means a person who is entrusted by law with the care of a child under eighteen years of age.

"Homeless youth shelter" means a facility that, in addition to other services it may provide, provides services and mass temporary shelter for a period of three days or more to youths who are at least eleven years of age or older and who otherwise are homeless youth as that term is defined in section 26-5.7-102 (2).

"ICON" means the computerized database of court records known as the integrated Colorado online network used by the state judicial department.

"Kin" means a relative of the child, a person ascribed by the family as having a family-like relationship with the child, or a person that has a prior significant relationship with the child. These relationships take into account cultural values and continuity of significant relationships with the child.

"Kinship foster care home" means a foster care home that is certified by a county department or a licensed child placement agency pursuant to section 26-6-910 or a federally recognized tribe pursuant to applicable federal law as having met the foster care certification requirements and where the foster care of the child is provided by kin. Kinship foster care providers are eligible for foster care reimbursement. A kinship foster care home provides twenty-four-hour foster care for a child or youth under the age of twenty-one years.

"License" means a legal document issued pursuant to this part 9 granting permission to operate a residential or day treatment child care facility or child placement agency. A license may be in the form of a provisional, probationary, permanent, or time-limited license.

"Licensee" means the entity or individual to which a license is issued and that has the legal capacity to enter into an agreement or contract, assume obligations, incur and pay debts, sue and be sued in its own right, and be held responsible for its actions. A licensee may be a governing body.

"Licensing" means, except as otherwise provided in subsection (10) of this section, the process by which the department approves a facility or agency for the purpose of conducting business as a residential or day treatment child care facility or child placement agency.

"Medical foster care" means a program of foster care that provides home-based care for medically fragile children and youth who would otherwise be confined to a hospital or institutional setting and includes, but is not limited to:

Infants impacted by prenatal drug and alcohol abuse;

Children with developmental disabilities that require ongoing medical intervention;

Children and youth diagnosed with acquired immune deficiency syndrome or human immunodeficiency virus;

Children with a failure to thrive or other nutritional disorders; and

Children dependent on technology such as respirators, tracheotomy tubes, or ventilators to survive.

"Negative licensing action" means a final agency action resulting in the denial of an application, the imposition of fines, or the suspension or revocation of a license issued pursuant to this part 9 or the demotion of such a license to a probationary license.

As used in this subsection (21), "final agency action" means the determination made by the department, after the opportunity for a hearing, to deny, suspend, revoke, or demote to probationary status a license issued pursuant to this part 9 or an agreement between the department and the licensee concerning the demotion of such a license to a probationary license.

"Out-of-home placement provider consortium" means a group of service providers that are formally organized and managed to achieve the goals of the county, group of counties, or mental health agency contracting for additional services other than treatment-related or child maintenance services.

"Person" means a corporation, partnership, association, firm, agency, institution, or individual.

"Place of residence" means the place or abode where a person actually lives and provides child care.

"Qualified individual" means a trained professional or licensed clinician, as defined in the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act". A "qualified individual" must be approved to serve as a qualified individual according to the state plan. A "qualified individual" must not be an interested party or participant in the juvenile court proceeding and must be free of any personal or business relationship that would cause a conflict of interest in evaluating the child, juvenile, or youth or making recommendations concerning the child's, juvenile's, or youth's placement and therapeutic needs according to the federal Title IV-E state plan or any waiver in accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 675a.

"Qualified residential treatment program" means a licensed and accredited program that has a trauma-informed treatment model that is designed to address the child's or youth's needs, including clinical needs, as appropriate, of children and youth with serious emotional or behavioral disorders or disturbances in accordance with the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act", 42 U.S.C. 672 (k)(4), and is able to implement the treatment identified for the child or youth by the assessment of the child or youth required in section 19-1-115 (4)(e)(I).

"Related" means any of the following relationships by blood, marriage, or adoption: Parent, grandparent, brother, sister, stepparent, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or cousin.

"Relative" means any of the following relationships by blood, marriage, or adoption: Parent, grandparent, son, daughter, grandson, granddaughter, brother, sister, stepparent, stepbrother, stepsister, stepson, stepdaughter, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or cousin.

"Residential child care facility" means a facility licensed by the state department pursuant to this part 9 to provide twenty-four-hour group care and treatment for five or more children operated under private, public, or nonprofit sponsorship. "Residential child care facility" includes community-based residential child care facilities; qualified residential treatment programs, as defined in section 26-5.4-102 (2); shelter facilities; and psychiatric residential treatment facilities as defined in section 25.5-4-103 (19.5). A residential child care facility may be eligible for designation by the executive director of the state department pursuant to article 65 of title 27. A child who is admitted to a residential child care facility must be:

Five years of age or older but less than eighteen years of age; or

Less than twenty-one years of age and placed by court order or voluntary placement; or

Accompanied by a parent if less than five years of age.

"Residential or day treatment child care facility" or "facility" means a residential child care facility, including a qualified residential treatment program, psychiatric residential treatment program, shelter care program, and homeless youth program; specialized group facility, including a group home and group center; day treatment center; secure residential treatment center; respite child care center; or homeless youth shelter, including a host family home.

"Respite child care center" means a facility for the purpose of providing temporary twenty-four-hour group care for three or more children or youth who are placed in certified foster care homes or approved noncertified kinship care homes, and children or youth with open cases through a regional accountable entity. A respite child care center is not a treatment facility, but rather its primary purpose is providing recreational activities, peer engagement, and skill development to the children and youth in its care. A respite child care center serves children and youth from five years of age to twenty-one years of age. A respite child care center may offer care for only part of a day. For purposes of this subsection (31), "respite child care" means an alternate form of care to enable caregivers to be temporarily relieved of caregiving responsibilities.

"Secure residential treatment center" means a facility operated under private ownership that is licensed by the department pursuant to this part 9 to provide twenty-four-hour group care and treatment in a secure setting for five or more children or persons up to the age of twenty-one years over whom the juvenile court retains jurisdiction pursuant to section 19-2.5-103 (6) who are committed by a court, pursuant to an adjudication of delinquency or pursuant to a determination of guilt of a delinquent act or having been convicted as an adult and sentenced for an act that would be a crime if committed in Colorado, or in the committing jurisdiction, to be placed in a secure facility.

"Sibling" means one or more individuals having one or both parents in common.

"Specialized group facility" means a facility sponsored and supervised by a county department or a licensed child placement agency for the purpose of providing twenty-four-hour care for three or more children, but fewer than twelve children, whose special needs can best be met through the medium of a small group. A child who is admitted to a specialized group facility must be:

At least seven years of age or older but less than eighteen years of age;

Less than twenty-one years of age and placed by court order or voluntary placement; or

Accompanied by a parent or legal guardian if less than seven years of age.

"Specialized group facility" includes specialized group homes and specialized group centers.

"Therapeutic foster care" means a program of foster care that incorporates treatment for the special physical, psychological, or emotional needs of a child placed with specially trained foster parents, but does not include medical foster care.

"Treatment foster care" means a clinically effective alternative to a residential treatment facility that combines the treatment technologies typically associated with more restrictive settings with a nurturing and individualized family environment.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 784, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-904. Applicability of part.

This part 9 does not apply to:

A child care facility that is approved, certified, or licensed by another state agency or by a federal government department or agency that has standards for operation of the facility and inspects or monitors the facility;

Occasional care of children that has no apparent pattern and occurs with or without compensation;

Juvenile courts; or

Nursing homes that have children as residents.

A licensee or governing body for which the license is suspended pursuant to section 24-4-104 or that has received a final agency action resulting in the revocation of a license issued pursuant to this part 9 is prohibited from operating, except when the children being cared for are related to the caregiver.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 790, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-905. Licenses - out-of-state notices and consent - demonstration pilot program - definition - rules.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section or elsewhere in this part 9, a person shall not operate a residential or day treatment child care facility or child placement agency without first being licensed by the state department to operate or maintain the facility or agency and paying the prescribed fee. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section, a license that the state department issues is permanent unless otherwise revoked or suspended pursuant to section 26-6-914.

A person operating a foster care home is not required to obtain a license from the state department to operate the foster care home if the person holds a certificate issued pursuant to section 26-6-910 to operate the home from a county department or a child placement agency licensed under the provisions of this part 9. A certificate is considered a license for the purpose of this part 9, including but not limited to the investigation and criminal history background checks required under sections 26-6-910 and 26-6-912.

On and after July 1, 2002, and contingent upon the timelines for implementation of the computer "trails" enhancements, child placement agencies that certify foster care homes must be licensed annually until the implementation of any risk-based schedule for the renewal of child placement agency licenses pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(II) of this section. The state board shall promulgate rules specifying the procedural requirements associated with the renewal of child placement agency licenses. The rules must include the requirement that the state department conduct assessments of the child placement agency.

On and after January 1, 2004, and upon the functionality of the computer "trails" enhancements, the state department may implement a schedule for relicensing of child placement agencies that certify foster care homes that is based on risk factors such that child placement agencies with low risk factors must renew their licenses less frequently than child placement agencies with higher risk factors.

Prior to January 1, 2004, and contingent upon the timelines for implementation of the computer "trails" enhancements, the state department shall create classifications of child placement agency licenses that certify foster care homes that are based on risk factors as those factors are established by rule of the state board.

On and after July 1, 2021, all residential child care facilities must be licensed annually. The state board shall promulgate rules specifying the procedural requirements associated with the license renewal for residential child care facilities. The rules must include a requirement that the state department conduct assessments of the residential child care facility.

A person shall not receive or accept a child under eighteen years of age for placement, or place a child either temporarily or permanently in a home, other than with persons related to the child, without first obtaining a license as a child placement agency from the department and paying the fee prescribed for the license.

The department may issue a one-time provisional license for a period of six months to an applicant for an original license for a foster care home, permitting the applicant to operate the foster care home if the applicant is temporarily unable to conform to all standards required under this part 9, upon proof by the applicant that the applicant is attempting to conform to the standards or to comply with any other requirements. The applicant has the right to appeal any standard that the applicant believes presents an undue hardship or has been applied too stringently by the department. Upon the filing of an appeal, the department shall proceed in the manner prescribed for licensee appeals in section 26-6-909 (4).

The department shall not issue a license for a residential or day treatment child care facility until the facilities that the applicant or licensee will operate or maintain are approved by the department of public health and environment as conforming to the sanitary standards prescribed by the department pursuant to section 25-1.5-101 (1)(h) and unless the facilities conform to fire prevention and protection requirements of local fire departments in the locality of the facility or, in lieu thereof, of the division of labor standards and statistics.

A person shall not send or bring into this state a child for the purposes of foster care or adoption without sending notice of the pending placement and receiving the consent of the department, or its designated agent, to the placement. The notice must contain:

The name and the date and place of birth of the child;

The identity and address or addresses of the parents or legal guardian;

The identity and address of the person sending or bringing the child;

The name and address of the person to or with whom the sending person proposes to send, bring, or place the child;

A full statement of the reasons for the proposed action and evidence of the authority pursuant to which the placement is proposed to be made.

The state board of human services shall establish rules for the approval of foster care homes and child care centers that provide twenty-four-hour care of children between eighteen and twenty-one years of age for whom the county department is financially responsible and when placed in foster care by the county department.

On and after July 1, 2005, and subject to designation as a qualified accrediting entity as required by the "Intercountry Adoption Act of 2000", 42 U.S.C. sec. 14901 et seq., the state department may license and accredit a child placement agency for purposes of providing adoption services for conventional adoptions pursuant to the "Intercountry Adoption Act of 2000", 42 U.S.C. sec. 14901 et seq. The state board of human services may adopt rules consistent with federal law governing the procedures for adverse actions regarding accreditation, which procedures may vary from the procedures set forth in the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24.

The state department shall not issue a license to operate a residential or day treatment child care facility or a child placement agency, and any license or certificate issued prior to August 7, 2006, is revoked or suspended if the applicant for the license or certificate, an affiliate of the applicant, a person employed by the applicant, or a person who resides with the applicant at the facility has been convicted of:
(8) (a) (I) The state department shall not issue a license to operate a residential or day treatment child care facility or a child placement agency, and any license or certificate issued prior to August 7, 2006, is revoked or suspended if the applicant for the license or certificate, an affiliate of the applicant, a person employed by the applicant, or a person who resides with the applicant at the facility has been convicted of:

Child abuse, as specified in section 18-6-401;

A crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406;

Any offenses involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9);

Any felony, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3;

Any felony involving physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense within the five years preceding the date of application for a license or certificate;

A pattern of misdemeanor convictions, as defined by rule of the state board, within the ten years immediately preceding the date of submission of the application; or

Any offense in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any one of the offenses described in subsections (8)(a)(I)(A) to (8)(a)(I)(F) of this section.

As used in this subsection (8)(a), "convicted" means a conviction by a jury or by a court and also includes a deferred judgment and sentence agreement, a deferred prosecution agreement, a deferred adjudication agreement, an adjudication, and a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

An applicant, licensee, or employee of the applicant or licensee who meets the definition of a department employee or an independent contractor, as those terms are defined in section 27-90-111, or who works for a contracting agency, as defined in section 27-90-111, and who will have direct contact with vulnerable persons, as defined in section 27-90-111 (2)(e), is required to submit to a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check in the same manner as required pursuant to section 27-90-111 (9); except that the state department shall not bear the cost of the criminal history record check required by this subsection (8)(a)(III). The state department may also conduct a comparison search on the Colorado state courts public access system to determine the crime or crimes for which the individual having direct contact with vulnerable persons was arrested or convicted and the disposition of such crime or crimes. The criminal history record check required by this subsection (8)(a)(III) must be submitted to the state department prior to the individual having direct contact with vulnerable persons, and an applicant, licensee, or employee of an applicant or licensee must not be allowed to have direct contact with vulnerable persons if he or she does not meet the requirements set forth in this subsection (8) and in section 27-90-111 (9).

The department shall determine the convictions identified in subsection (8)(a) of this section according to the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation, the ICON system at the state judicial department, or any other source, as set forth in section 26-6-912 (1)(a)(II). A certified copy of the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction of a conviction, deferred judgment and sentence agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, or deferred adjudication agreement is prima facie evidence of the conviction or agreement. A license or certificate to operate a residential or day treatment child care facility, foster care home, or child placement agency shall not be issued if the state department has a certified court order from another state indicating that the person applying for the license or certificate has been convicted of child abuse or any unlawful sexual offense against a child under a law of any other state or the United States or the state department has a certified court order from another state that the person applying for the license or certificate has entered into a deferred judgment or deferred prosecution agreement in another state as to child abuse or any sexual offense against a child.

No later than January 1, 2004, the state board shall promulgate rules that require all current and prospective employees of a county department who in their position have direct contact with a child in the process of being placed or who has been placed in foster care to submit a set of fingerprints for purposes of obtaining a fingerprint-based criminal history record check, unless the person has already submitted a set of fingerprints. The check must be conducted in the same manner as provided in subsection (8) of this section and in section 26-6-912 (1)(a). The person's employment is conditional upon a satisfactory criminal background check and subject to the same grounds for denial or dismissal as set forth in subsection (8) of this section and in section 26-6-912 (1)(a). The costs for the fingerprint-based criminal history record check must be borne by the applicant.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check performed pursuant to this subsection (9) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the state department shall require the person to submit to a name-based criminal history record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d). The costs for the name-based judicial record check must be borne by the applicant.

The state department shall not issue a license to operate a residential or day treatment child care facility, foster care home, or child placement agency if the person applying for the license or an affiliate of the applicant, a person employed by the applicant, or a person who resides with the applicant at the facility has been determined to be insane or mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and, if the court enters, pursuant to part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15, or section 27-65-109 (4) or 27-65-127, an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency or insanity is of such a degree that the applicant is incapable of operating a residential or day treatment child care facility, foster care home, or child placement agency, the record of such determination and entry of such order being conclusive evidence thereof.

The state department is strongly encouraged to examine and report to the general assembly on the benefits of licensing any private, nonprofit child placement agency that is dedicated to serving the special needs of foster care children through services delivered by specialized foster care parents in conjunction with and supported by staff of the child placement agency. The child placement agencies examined must be able to:

Offer the following services:

Provision of educated, skilled, and experienced foster care parents;

Social work support for the foster care child and foster care family;

Twenty-four-hour, on-call availability;

Monthly foster care parent support group meetings;

Ongoing educational and networking opportunities for any foster care family;

Individualized treatment plans developed through team collaboration;

Professional and family networking opportunities; and

Respite support and reimbursement;

Provide a form of specialized foster care including, but not limited to, the following types of care:

Medical foster care;

Respite foster care;

Therapeutic foster care;

Developmentally disabled foster care; and

Treatment foster care.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 790, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-906. Compliance with local government zoning regulations - notice to local governments - provisional licensure - repeal.

The department shall require a residential or day treatment child care facility seeking a license pursuant to section 26-6-905 to comply with any applicable zoning and land use development regulations of the municipality, city and county, or county where the facility is situated. Failure to comply with applicable zoning and land use regulations constitutes grounds for the denial of a license to a facility.

The department shall ensure that timely written notice is provided to the municipality, city and county, or county where a residential or day treatment child care facility is situated, including the address of the facility and the population and number of persons to be served by the facility, when any of the following occurs:

A person applies for a license to operate a facility pursuant to section 26-6-905;

A license is granted to operate a facility pursuant to section 26-6-905; or

A change is made in the license of a facility.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in the event of a zoning or other delay or dispute between a facility and the municipality, city and county, or county where the facility is situated, the department may grant a provisional license to the facility for up to six months pending resolution of the delay or dispute.

Prior to July 1, 2024, the provisions of this section do not apply to a foster care home certified pursuant to this part 9 or to a specialized group facility that is licensed to provide care for three or more children pursuant to this part 9 but that is providing care for three or fewer children who are determined to have a developmental disability by a community centered board or who have a serious emotional disturbance.
(4) (a) (I) Prior to July 1, 2024, the provisions of this section do not apply to a foster care home certified pursuant to this part 9 or to a specialized group facility that is licensed to provide care for three or more children pursuant to this part 9 but that is providing care for three or fewer children who are determined to have a developmental disability by a community centered board or who have a serious emotional disturbance.

This subsection (4)(a) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

On and after July 1, 2024, the provisions of this section do not apply to a foster care home certified pursuant to this part 9 or to a specialized group facility that is licensed to provide care for three or more children pursuant to this part 9 but that is providing care for three or fewer children who are determined to have an intellectual and developmental disability by a case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, or who have a serious emotional disturbance.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 795, § 17, effective July 1.